Hawaii statutes.
[§142-100 Beekeepers, registration; apiary
program.] (a) Beekeepers may register with the department of agriculture,
on forms prescribed and prepared by the department, which shall include the
following information:

(1) The name, address, and contact information for
the beekeeper; and

(2) Other information that may assist the department
in compiling accurate information on Hawaii's beekeeping industry.

(b) The department of agriculture shall keep
registration information confidential subject to the limitations on
confidentiality imposed under chapter 92F; provided that the name and business
address of each registrant shall be made publicly available by the department;
and provided further that the department may compile statistics based on the
information, pursuant to section 141-1.

(c) The registration shall be effective for a
period of one year, and shall be renewed at the end of the one-year period.

[(d)] The department of agriculture shall
establish an apiary program, which may include the following positions, to
carry out the purposes of this [section]:

(1) One apiary specialist;

(2) One apiary planner; and

(3) Two apiary technicians. [L 2011, c 200, §§2, 3]

Revision Note

Subsection (d) is codified to this section pursuant to
§23G-15.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next